California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(a) In the case of a taxpayer who has been a transferee in a reorganization to which Sections 23251 to 23254, inclusive, or corresponding sections of prior laws, were applicable, there shall be allowed as a credit for the taxable year of dissolution or withdrawal, the excess of the tax paid over the minimum tax paid by prior transferors or by the transferee as a transferor under Sections 23222 to 23224, inclusive, or corresponding sections of prior laws, for the first taxable year of the transferors that constituted a full 12 months of
 doing business and whose income has been included in the measure of tax of a succeeding taxable year.

(b) The credit allowable under this section shall be in addition to any credit that may be allowable to the taxpayer under Section 23201. However, any credit previously allowed under Section 23201, under this section, or for a year in which the taxpayer or transferor ceased doing business, shall not be allowed again in computing a credit under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 626.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

23203.

The credits provided by Sections 23201 and 23202 shall be allowable only upon submission by the taxpayer of evidence establishing to the satisfaction of the Franchise Tax Board the amount of the tax paid pursuant to Sections 23222 to 23224, inclusive (or corresponding sections of prior laws), and with respect to which the credit is claimed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1304.)
-------------------------------------------

23204.

(a) No credit under this article shall be allowed or made after four years from the last day prescribed for filing the return for the taxable year of dissolution or withdrawal, or within the periods prescribed under Article 1 of Chapter 22, whichever period expires the latest, unless before the expiration of such period a claim therefor is filed by the taxpayer.

(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 23204(a), no credit under this article shall be allowed or made to a taxpayer which has been suspended for a period of four continuous years beginning on or after January 1,
 1975.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 552.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Commencing Corporations [23221. - 23226.]

23221.

(a) Any credit union that incorporates under the laws of this state or qualifies to transact intrastate business in this state shall thereupon prepay a tax of twenty-five dollars ($25) as provided in Section 23153. The prepayment shall be made to the Secretary of State with the filing of the articles of incorporation or the statement and designation by a foreign corporation. The Secretary of State shall transmit the amount of the prepayment to the Franchise Tax Board. The Franchise Tax Board shall certify to the
 Secretary of State on an individual or class basis those domestic or foreign corporations that are exempt from prepayment or for which prepayment to the Secretary of State is waived.

(b) This section shall become operative and apply beginning on or after January 1, 2001.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 2) and added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 64, Sec. 3.   Effective July 6, 1999.   Section operative January 1, 2001, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

23222.

(a) If a taxpayer commences to do business in this state during its first taxable year its tax for that year shall be adjusted upon the basis of the net income received during that taxable year, at the rate applicable to that year, a credit being allowed for the prepayment of the minimum tax. The return for the first taxable year, which shall be filed within 2 months and 15 days after the close of that year, shall also be the basis for the tax of said taxpayer for its second taxable year, if its first taxable year is a period of 12 months. In every case in which the first taxable year of a taxpayer constitutes a period of less than 12 months, or in
 which a taxpayer does business for a period of less than 12 months during its first taxable year, said taxpayer shall pay as a prepayment of the tax for its second taxable year a tax based on the income for the first taxable year computed under the law and at the rate applicable to the second taxable year, the same to be due and payable at the same times and in the same manner as if that amount were the entire amount of its tax for that year; and upon the filing of its tax return within 2 months and 15 days after the close of the second taxable year it shall pay a tax for said year, at the rate applicable to that year, based upon its net income received during that year, allowing a credit for the prepayment; but in no event, except as provided in Section 23332, shall the tax for the second taxable year be less than the amount of the prepayment for that year, and said return for its second taxable year shall also be the basis for the tax of said taxpayer for its third taxable year, if the second taxable year
 constitutes a period of 12 months.

(b) The provisions of subdivision (a) shall be applicable only if a taxpayer commenced doing business in this state before January 1, 1972.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

23222a.

In every case in which the second or succeeding taxable years of a commencing taxpayer constitute a period of less than 12 months or in which the taxpayer does business for a period of less than 12 months during its second or succeeding taxable years, the tax for such year or years shall be measured by the income of that period or periods subject to the continuation of the prepayment procedure outlined in Section 23222. In no event shall the income of any period or periods herein described be used as the measure of the tax for the succeeding taxable year, other than the prepayment, until the last short period is succeeded by a taxable period of 12 months, in which case
 the income of the last short period shall, if greater than the income of the 12-month period, constitute the measure of the tax for such 12-month period.

Thereafter the procedure outlined in Section 23222, in respect of the second and third taxable years, shall apply and the taxpayer shall not be subject to the provisions of this section.

In the event that a taxpayer is dissolved or withdraws from this state while subject to the provisions of this section, its tax for the year of dissolution or withdrawal shall be measured by its net income for such year. However, in no event shall the tax be less than the minimum tax provided by Section 23153.

The provisions of this section shall be applicable only if a taxpayer commenced doing business in this state before January 1, 1972.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

23223.

(a) When any taxpayer commences to do business in this state for the first time in any taxable year other than the year of incorporation or qualification, its tax for that taxable year and for the succeeding taxable year shall be computed in accordance with the provisions of Section 23222 relative to first and second taxable years, a credit being allowed for any tax payable under Section 23153 for the year in which it commences to do business.

(b) The provisions of subdivision (a) shall be applicable only if a taxpayer commenced doing business in this state before January 1,
 1972.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

23224.

(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 23222 and Section 23223, if a corporation, which has been subject to the provisions of Chapter 3 commences to do business in this state, its tax shall be computed as follows:

(1) Such corporation shall pay a tax under Chapter 3 for the whole of the year it commences to do such business;

(2) Such corporation shall, for the taxable year succeeding the year it commences to do business in this state, pay a tax under this chapter measured by its income for that taxable year;

(3) Such corporation shall, for its third taxable year, pay a tax, under this chapter, measured by its income for its second taxable year;

(4) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this part, such corporation shall file its return for such second and third taxable years on or before the 15th day of the third month following the close of its second taxable year.

(b) The provisions of subdivision (a) shall be applicable only if a taxpayer commenced doing business in this state before January 1, 1972.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

23224.5.

(a) After December 31, 1971, if a corporation which has been subject to the provisions of Chapter 3 commences to do business in this state, such corporation shall pay a tax under Chapter 3 for the whole of the taxable year it commences to do such business.

(b) For the purposes of Sections 23151.1 and 23183.1, the first taxable year subsequent to the taxable year the corporation commences to do such business (as described in subdivision (a)) shall be treated as the taxable year of commencement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 552.)
-------------------------------------------

23225.

The adjusted tax, as provided in Sections 23222 to 23224.5, inclusive, for any taxable year in excess of the prepayment for that year, shall be due and payable as provided in Article 2 (commencing with Section 18601) of Chapter 2 of Part 10.2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 34.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

23226.

In the case of the taxpayer taxable in the manner provided in Sections 23222 to 23224.5, inclusive, reporting income from any source on a deferred basis, the Franchise Tax Board is authorized to distribute or apportion such income, or deductions applicable thereto, if it determines that such distribution or apportionment is necessary in order to prevent avoidance of taxes or clearly to reflect the income of the taxpayer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 552.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Reorganized Corporations [23251. - 23253.]

23251.

The term “reorganization,” as used in this chapter, shall have the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 368 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 938, Sec. 26.2.   Effective September 7, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

23253.

Section 381(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to operating rules, shall apply in determining the close of the taxable year. If a short period year is required by use of Section 381(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, the transferor’s short year tax shall be computed using the provisions of Section 23151.1 for general corporations or Section 23181 for banks and financial corporations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 56.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Corporations Resuming Business [23281. - 23282.]

23281.

(a) (1) When a taxpayer ceases to do business within the state during any taxable year and does not dissolve or withdraw from the state during that year, and does not resume doing business during the succeeding taxable year, its tax for the taxable year in which it resumes doing business prior to January 1, 2000, shall be the greater of the following:

(A) The tax computed upon the basis of the net income of the income year in which it ceased doing business, except where the income has already been included in the measure of a tax imposed by this chapter.

(B) The minimum tax prescribed in Section 23153.

(2) When a taxpayer ceases to do business within the state during any taxable year and does not dissolve or withdraw from the state during that year, and does not resume doing business during the succeeding taxable year, its tax for the taxable year in which it resumes doing business, on or after January 1, 2000, shall be according to or measured by its net income for the taxable year in which it resumes doing business.

(b) The tax shall be due and payable at the time the corporation resumes doing
 business, or on or before the due date of the return for its taxable year, whichever is later. All the provisions of this part relating to delinquent taxes shall be applicable to the tax if it is not paid on or before its due date.

(c) This section does not apply to a corporation that became subject to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 23501) after it discontinued doing business in this state (see Section 23224.5).

(d) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall apply to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2016.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 348, Sec. 4.   (AB 1775)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

23282.

(a) The tax imposed upon any taxpayer which has suffered the suspension or forfeiture provided in Section 23301, and which revives in any taxable year other than the taxable year in which suspension or forfeiture occurred, shall be computed in the same manner as provided in Sections 23222 to 23224, inclusive, relative to the computation of taxes upon taxpayers
 commencing to do business for the first time after incorporation or qualification. In addition to the taxes, penalties, and interest specified in Section 23305, such taxpayer shall prepay a tax in an amount equal to the minimum tax provided for in Section 23153 as a condition precedent to the issuance of a certificate of revivor.

(b) After December 31, 1971, and before January 1, 2000, the tax imposed upon any taxpayer which has suffered the suspension or forfeiture provided in Section 23301, and which revives in any taxable year other than the taxable year in which suspension or forfeiture occurred, shall be—(1) In the case of a taxpayer which was doing business in the year next preceding the year in which revivor took place, computed upon the basis of the net income for that next preceding income year,(2) In the case of a taxpayer which resumed doing business in the year of revivor, computed upon the basis of the net income for the year in which it ceased doing business, unless such income is or has otherwise been subject to tax,(3) In the case of a taxpayer which first commences to do business in the year of revivor, the minimum tax provided in Section 23153,(4) In no event less than the minimum tax provided in Section 23153.In addition to the taxes, penalties, and interest specified in Section 23305, such taxpayer shall prepay the minimum tax imposed by this subdivision as a condition precedent to the issuance of a certificate
 of revivor.

(c) After December 31, 1999, the tax imposed upon any taxpayer that has suffered the suspension or forfeiture provided in Section 23301, and that revives in any taxable year other than the taxable year in which suspension or forfeiture occurred, shall be computed upon the basis of the net income for the taxable year in which it revives, but in no event less than the minimum tax provided in Section 23153.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 58.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Suspension and Revivor [23301. - 23311.]

23301.

Except for the purposes of filing an application for exempt status or amending the articles of incorporation or organization as necessary either to perfect that application or to set forth a new name, the powers, rights, and privileges of a domestic taxpayer may be suspended, and the exercise of the powers, rights, and privileges of a foreign taxpayer in this state may be forfeited, if any of the following conditions occur:

(a) If any tax, penalty, or interest, or any portion thereof, that is due and payable under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 19001) of Part 10.2, or under this part, either at the time the return is required to be filed or on or before the 15th day of the 9th month
 following the close of the taxable year, is not paid on or before 6 p.m. on the last day of the 12th month after the close of the taxable year.

(b) If any tax, penalty, or interest, or any portion thereof, due and payable under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 19001) of Part 10.2, or under this part, upon notice and demand from the Franchise Tax Board, is not paid on or before 6 p.m. on the last day of the 11th month following the due date of the tax.

(c) If any liability, or any portion thereof, which is due and payable under Article 7 (commencing with Section 19131) of Chapter 4 of Part 10.2, is not paid on or before 6 p.m. on the last day of the 11th month following the date that the tax liability is due and payable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 80, Sec. 121.   (SB 1525)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

23301.5.

Except for the purposes of filing an application for exempt status or amending the articles of incorporation or organization as necessary either to perfect that application or to set forth a new name, the powers, rights, and privileges of a domestic taxpayer may be suspended, and the exercise of the powers, rights, and privileges of a foreign taxpayer in this state may be forfeited, if a taxpayer fails to file a tax return required by this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 209, Sec. 3.   (AB 1765)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

23301.6.

Sections 23301, 23301.5, and 23775 shall apply to a foreign taxpayer only if the taxpayer is qualified or registered to do business in California. A taxpayer that is required under Section 2105 or 17708.02 of the Corporations Code to qualify or register to do business shall not be deemed to have qualified or registered to do business for purposes of this article unless the taxpayer has in fact qualified or registered with the Secretary of State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 209, Sec. 4.   (AB 1765)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

23302.

(a) Forfeiture or suspension of a taxpayer’s powers, rights, and privileges pursuant to Section 23301, 23301.5, or 23775 shall occur and become effective only as expressly provided in this section in conjunction with Section 21020, which requires notice prior to the suspension of a taxpayer’s powers, rights, and privileges.

(b) The notice requirements of Section 21020 shall also apply to any forfeiture of a taxpayer’s powers, rights, and privileges pursuant to Section 23301, 23301.5, or 23775 and to any voidability pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 23304.1.

(c) The Franchise Tax Board shall transmit the names of taxpayers to the Secretary of State as to
 which the suspension or forfeiture provisions of Section 23301, 23301.5, or 23775 are or become applicable, and the suspension or forfeiture therein provided for shall thereupon become effective. The certificate of the Secretary of State shall be prima facie evidence of the suspension or forfeiture.

(d) If a taxpayer’s powers, rights, and privileges are forfeited or suspended pursuant to Section 23301, 23301.5, or 23775, without limiting any other consequences of such forfeiture or suspension, the taxpayer shall not be entitled to sell, transfer, or exchange real property in California during the period of forfeiture or suspension.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 209, Sec. 5.   (AB 1765)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

23303.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 23301 or 23301.5, any taxpayer that transacts business or receives income within the period of its suspension or forfeiture shall be subject to tax under the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 209, Sec. 6.   (AB 1765)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

23304.1.

(a) Every contract made in this state by a taxpayer during the time that the taxpayer’s powers, rights, and privileges are suspended or forfeited pursuant to Section 23301, 23301.5, or 23775 shall, subject to Section 23304.5, be voidable at the request of any party to the contract other than the taxpayer.

(b) If a foreign taxpayer that
 neither is qualified to do business nor has an account number from the Franchise Tax Board, fails to file a tax return required under this part, any contract made in this state by that taxpayer during the applicable period specified in subdivision (c) shall, subject to Section 23304.5, be voidable at the request of any party to the contract other than the taxpayer.

(c) (1) For purposes of subdivision (b), the applicable period shall be the period beginning on January 1, 1991, or the first day of the taxable year for which the taxpayer has failed to file a return, whichever is later, and ending on the earlier of the date the taxpayer qualified to do business in this state or the date the taxpayer obtained an account number from the Franchise Tax Board.

(2) With regard to a limited liability company, the applicable period shall be the period beginning on
 January 1, 2014, or the first day of the taxable year for which the taxpayer has failed to file a return, whichever is later, and ending on the earlier of the date the taxpayer qualified to do business in this state or on the date the taxpayer obtained an account number from the Franchise Tax Board.

(d) If a taxpayer fails to file a tax return required under this part, to pay any tax or other amount owing to the Franchise Tax Board under this part or to file any statement or return required under Section 23772 or 23774, within 60 days after the Franchise Tax Board mails a written demand therefor, any contract made in this state by the taxpayer during the period beginning at the end of the 60-day demand period and ending on the date relief is granted under Section 23305.1, or the date the taxpayer qualifies to do business in this state, whichever is earlier, shall be voidable at the request of any party to the contract other than the taxpayer.
 This subdivision shall apply only to a taxpayer if the taxpayer has an account number from the Franchise Tax Board, but has not qualified to do business under the Corporations Code. In the case of a taxpayer that has not complied with the 60-day demand, the taxpayer’s name, Franchise Tax Board account number, date of the demand, date of the first day after the end of the 60-day demand period, and the fact that the taxpayer did not within that period pay the tax or other amount or file the statement or return, as the case may be, shall be a matter of public record.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 325, Sec. 3.   (AB 1143)   Effective September 15, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

23304.5.

A party that has the right to declare a contract to be voidable pursuant to Section 23304.1 may exercise that right only in a lawsuit brought by either party with respect to the contract in a court of competent jurisdiction and the rights of the parties to the contract shall not be affected by Section 23304. 1 except to the extent expressly provided by a final judgment of the court, which judgment shall not be issued unless the taxpayer is allowed a reasonable opportunity to cure the voidability under Section 23305.1. If the court finds that the contract is voidable under Section 23304.1, the court shall order the contract to be rescinded. However, in
 no event shall the court order rescission of a taxpayer’s contract unless the taxpayer receives full restitution of the benefits provided by the taxpayer under the contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 926, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

23305.

Any taxpayer which has suffered the suspension or forfeiture provided for in Section 23301 or 23301.5 may be relieved therefrom upon making application therefor in writing to the Franchise Tax Board and upon the filing of all tax returns required under this part, and the payment of the tax, additions to tax, penalties, interest, and any other amounts for nonpayment of which the suspension or forfeiture occurred, together with all other taxes, additions to tax, penalties, interest, and any other amounts due under this part, and upon the issuance by the Franchise Tax Board of a certificate of revivor. Application for the certificate on behalf of any
 taxpayer which has suffered suspension or forfeiture may be made by any stockholder or creditor, by a majority of the surviving trustees or directors thereof, by an officer, or by any other person who has interest in the relief from suspension or forfeiture.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1082, Sec. 6.   Applicable to income years beginning on or after January 1, 1991, by Sec. 12 of Ch. 1082.)
-------------------------------------------

23305.1.

(a) A taxpayer may make application to the Franchise Tax Board for relief from the voidability provisions of Section 23304.1. To be relieved from voidability, the taxpayer shall do all of the following:

(1) Provide the Franchise Tax Board with an application for relief from contract voidability in a form and manner prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board.

(2) Include on the application the period for which relief is requested in accordance with subdivision (b).

(3) File any tax returns required to be filed under this part with the Franchise Tax Board, including returns for the period for which
 relief is requested.

(4) Pay any tax, additions to tax, penalties, interest, and any other amounts owing to the Franchise Tax Board, including any liability attributable to the period for which relief is requested.

(5) Pay any penalty imposed under subdivision (b) for the period for which relief is requested.

(6) In the case of a taxpayer that applies for and enters into an approved voluntary disclosure agreement in accordance with Article 8 (commencing with Section 19191) of Chapter 4 of Part 10.2, for purposes of this section, the taxpayer shall be considered to have met the requirements of paragraphs (3), (4), and (5) if the taxpayer fulfills to the satisfaction of the Franchise Tax Board all the specifications of the voluntary disclosure agreement within the meaning of paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section
 19191 and if the Franchise Tax Board has not found that any of the circumstances described in Section 19194 has rendered the voluntary disclosure agreement null and void.

(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), both of the following shall apply:

(A) The period for which relief is requested shall begin on the date that one of the taxpayer’s taxable years begins and ends on the date that relief is granted.

(B) The Franchise Tax Board shall assess a daily penalty equal to one hundred dollars ($100) for each day of the period for which relief from voidability is granted, but not to exceed a total penalty equal to the amount of the tax for the period for which relief is requested.

(2) If an application for relief from voidability
 is filed for a period in which an application for revivor has been filed and the certificate of revivor has been issued, all of the following shall apply:

(A) The period for which relief is requested shall begin on the date the taxpayer’s powers, rights, and privileges had been suspended or forfeited and ends on the date relief is granted.

(B) The Franchise Tax Board shall assess a daily penalty equal to one hundred dollars ($100) for each day of the period for which relief from voidability is granted, but not to exceed a total penalty equal to that amount of the tax that would be imposed under Sections 17941 and 17942 or Section 23151 and, except as provided in subparagraph (C), that penalty shall be equal to no less than the amount of the minimum tax provided under Section 17941 or 23153 for the period for which relief is requested.

(C) In the case of an exempt organization or trust subject to Article 2 (commencing with Section 23731) of Chapter 4 (the tax on unrelated business taxable income), the daily penalty provided in subparagraph (B) shall not exceed a total penalty equal to the amount of tax imposed upon its unrelated business taxable income for the period for which relief is requested.

(3) Any penalty imposed under this subdivision shall, subject to Section 23305.2, be due and payable on demand by the Franchise Tax Board.

(c) (1) Upon satisfaction of the conditions specified in subdivision (a), including through the application of Section 23305.2, the following shall apply:

(A) All contracts entered into during the period for which relief is granted that
 have not been rescinded by a final court order pursuant to Section 23304.5 may be enforced in the same manner and to the same extent, with regard to both the parties to the contract and any third parties, as if the contract had never been voidable.

(B) Any sale, transfer, or exchange of real property in California during the period for which relief is granted and which the taxpayer at that time was not entitled to sell, transfer, or exchange by reason of subdivision (d) of Section 23302 and which has not been rescinded by a final court order pursuant to Section 23304.5, shall be as valid as if the taxpayer had not been subject to subdivision (d) of Section 23302 at the time of the sale, transfer, or exchange.

(2) Upon being granted relief from voidability, the Franchise Tax Board shall certify that relief to the taxpayer in a form and manner as prescribed by the Franchise Tax
 Board. The certificate shall be issued or mailed to the taxpayer, or as directed by the taxpayer, and shall indicate the period for which relief is granted.

(d) The fact that a certificate of relief from voidability was issued pursuant to this section and the information contained on that certificate shall be subject to public disclosure. The certificate shall be prima facie evidence of the relief from voidability for contracts entered into during the period of relief stated on the certificate and the certificate may be recorded in the office of the county recorder of any county of this state.

(e) Subject to limitations set forth in Section 17 of Chapter 926 of the Statutes of 1990, a taxpayer that received a certificate of revivor between January 1, 1990, and January 1, 1991, may apply for relief from voidability under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 209, Sec. 7.   (AB 1765)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

23305.2.

Notwithstanding Sections 23305 and 23305.1 that require a taxpayer to pay any liability to the Franchise Tax Board as a condition to revivor or relief from voidability, the Franchise Tax Board shall issue a certificate of revivor under Section 23305, or of relief from voidability under Section 23305.1, if the taxpayer provides the Franchise Tax Board with an assumption of liability, or a bond, deposit, or other security for taxpayer’s liability, that is acceptable to the Franchise Tax Board. The Franchise Tax Board shall notify the person filing the
 application for revivor or relief from voidability of the amount of the bond, deposit, or other security, or of the terms of an assumption of liability, that must be furnished as a condition of the revivor or the relief from voidability. Obtaining revivor or voidability relief by securing the debt pursuant to this section shall not constitute an admission of liability by the taxpayer, nor relieve the taxpayer or any individual or corporation from liability for any taxes, additions to tax, penalties, or interest imposed by this part. A taxpayer that provides an assumption of liability or a bond, deposit, or other security to obtain revivor or relief from voidability may, notwithstanding Section 23305 or 23305.1, file any returns required under those sections within a reasonable time after relief is granted by the Franchise Tax Board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 605, Sec. 68.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

23305.5.

For purposes of this article:

(a) “Taxpayer” means either:

(1) A corporation subject to tax under this chapter.

(2) A business entity organized under a statute or law, under a state or a federally recognized Indian tribe, under
 another jurisdiction, if the statute or law describes or refers to the entity as a limited liability company or if regulations of the Franchise Tax Board identify a business entity organized under the laws of a foreign country as a limited liability company.

(b) With regard to a limited liability company:

(1) “Articles of incorporation” shall include a limited liability company’s articles of organization.

(2) “Tax” shall include the tax and fee imposed by Sections 17941 and 17942, or former Sections 23091 and 23092, respectively.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 325, Sec. 4.   (AB 1143)   Effective September 15, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

23305a.

Before the certificate of revivor is issued by the Franchise Tax Board, it shall obtain from the Secretary of State an endorsement upon the application of the fact that the name of the taxpayer then meets the requirements of subdivision (b) of Section 201 or subdivision (b) of Section 17701.08 of the Corporations Code in the case of a domestic taxpayer or of subdivision (b) of Section 2106 or Section 17708.05 of the Corporations Code in the case of a foreign taxpayer that has qualified to do business. The reference to amendment of the articles of incorporation to set forth a new name contained in Sections 23301, 23301.5, and 23775 includes in the case of a foreign taxpayer the filing of an amended statement and designation to set forth its new name or to set
 forth an assumed name under subdivision (b) of Section 2106 or Section 17708.05 of the
 Corporations Code. Upon the issuance of the certificate by the Franchise Tax Board the taxpayer therein named shall become reinstated but the reinstatement shall be without prejudice to any action, defense, or right which has accrued by reason of the original suspension or forfeiture, except that contracts which were voidable pursuant to Section 23304.1, but which have not been rescinded pursuant to Section 23304.5, may have that voidability cured in accordance with Section 23305.1. The certificate of revivor shall be prima facie evidence of the reinstatement and the certificate may be recorded in the office of the county recorder of any county of this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 80, Sec. 122.   (SB 1525)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

23305b.

Notwithstanding Section 23305, the Franchise Tax Board may revive a taxpayer to good standing without full payment of the taxes, penalties, and interest due if it determines that the revivor will improve the prospects for collection of the full amount due. This revivor may be limited as to time or may limit the functions the revived taxpayer can perform, or both. The taxpayer’s powers, rights, and privileges may again be suspended or forfeited if the Franchise Tax Board determines that the prospects for collection of the full amount due have not been improved by the revivor of the taxpayer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 209, Sec. 9.   (AB 1765)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

23305c.

(a) Upon issuance of the certificate of revivor, the Franchise Tax Board shall transmit to the Secretary of State the revived taxpayer’s name and its entity number.

(b) The taxpayer’s name and number, the fact that the taxpayer’s powers, rights, and privileges have been revived and the effective date of the revivor shall be a matter of public record.

(c) If the Franchise Tax Board determines that a suspension or forfeiture was in error by the Franchise Tax Board, the Franchise Tax Board shall, in connection with the revivor, indicate that the taxpayer is “restored.” The status of the restored taxpayer shall be retroactive to the date of suspension or forfeiture
 as if there had been no suspension or forfeiture.

(d) If the Franchise Tax Board determines that the mailing of the 60-day demand notice referred to in subdivision (d) of Section 23304.1 was in error or that the Franchise Tax Board’s original determination as to compliance with the 60-day demand notice was in error, the Franchise Tax Board’s revised conclusions also shall be part of the public record referred to in that subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 209, Sec. 10.   (AB 1765)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

23305d.

A certificate of suspension or forfeiture from the Franchise Tax Board setting forth that the suspended or forfeited taxpayer has been notified of its liability for tax or requirement to file a return under this part and that the tax has not been paid or the return has not been filed, shall constitute prima facie evidence of the facts.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 23572 by Stats. 1990, Ch. 926, Sec. 16.)
-------------------------------------------

23305e.

(a) The Franchise Tax Board may provide letters of good standing, verifying a taxpayer’s status for doing business in California, at a charge reflecting the reasonable costs to the department of responding to these requests.

(b) Fees received under this section shall be handled in accordance with Section 19604.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 209, Sec. 11.   (AB 1765)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

23310.

(a) The Franchise Tax Board may abate, upon written request by a qualified entity, unpaid qualified taxes, interest, and penalties for the taxable years in which the qualified entity certifies, under penalty of perjury, that it was not doing business, within the meaning of subdivision (a) of Section 23101, has ceased doing business, and does not have any remaining assets in the business.

(b) For purposes of this
 section:

(1) “Qualified entity” means a domestic corporation subject to Division 1 (commencing with Section 100) of Title 1 of the Corporations Code or a domestic limited liability company subject to Title 2.6 (commencing with Section 17701.01) of the Corporations Code that satisfies either of the following conditions:

(A) Was never doing business, within the meaning of subdivision (a) of Section 23101, in this state at any time after the time of its incorporation in this state.

(B) Was previously doing business, within the meaning of subdivision (a) of Section 23101, and has filed all returns required under Section 18601, 18633, or 18633.5 for the tax years prior to cessation of doing business.

(2) “Qualified taxes, interest, and penalties” means tax
 imposed under Section 17941 or 23153, and associated interest and penalties, and any penalties imposed under Section 19141. “Qualified taxes, interest, and penalties” does not include tax imposed under Section 17942, 23501, or 23731, or associated interest or penalties, and does not include additional tax, penalties, or interest resulting from a final or pending state or federal audit.

(c) In no instance shall the taxes abated pursuant to subdivision (a) exceed the minimum or annual tax imposed under Section 17941 or 23153.

(d) A qualified entity shall establish that it has ceased all business operations and has no remaining assets at the time of filing the request for abatement pursuant to this section.

(e) The abatement of unpaid qualified tax, interest, and penalties pursuant to this section is conditioned on the
 dissolution of a corporation or the cancellation of a limited liability company of the qualified entity with the Secretary of State prior to the abatement.
